Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202561-208
Chief Water Officer; survey of streams.

The Chief Water Officer may make surveys of streams showing location of possible water power developments and irrigation projects.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 2, § 30, p. 845;

C.S.1922, § 8449;

C.S.1929, § 81-6330;

R.S.1943, § 46-212;

Laws 1984, LB 897, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-212;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 8;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 334.